Nevada, session 83, AB137.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 108.477 is hereby amended to read as follows:
108.477 1. If the declaration in opposition to the lien sale
executed by the occupant is not received by the date of the sale
specified in the notice mailed to the occupant, the owner may sell
the property.
2. The owner shall , at least one time in the week immediately
preceding the date of the sale, advertise the sale [once a week for 2
consecutive weeks immediately preceding the date of the sale] in a
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
newspaper of general circulation in the judicial district where the
sale is to be held.
3. The advertisement required pursuant to subsection 2 must
contain:
(a) [A general description of the personal property to be sold;
(b)] The name of the occupant;
[(c)] (b) The number of the individual storage space at the
facility where the personal property was stored; and
[(d)] (c) The name and address of the facility.
[3.] 4. If there is no newspaper of general circulation in the
judicial district where the sale is to be held, the advertisement must
be posted 10 days before the sale [in] :
(a) In at least six conspicuous places near the place of the sale [.
4.] ; or
(b) On an Internet website which is publicly accessible.
5. The sale must be conducted in a commercially reasonable
manner.
[5.] 6. After deducting the amount of the lien and the costs of
the sale, the owner shall retain any excess proceeds from the sale on
the behalf of the occupant.
[6.] 7. The occupant or any person authorized by the occupant
or by an order of the court may claim the excess proceeds or the
portion of the proceeds necessary to satisfy the person’s claim at any
time within 1 year after the date of the sale. After 1 year, the owner
shall pay any proceeds remaining from the sale to the treasurer of
the county where the sale was held for deposit in the general fund of
the county.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)